en: Canned salsifis
es: Salsifis en conserva
fr: Salsifis en conserve, Salsifis appertisés
hr: Konzervirani salsifis
nl: Schorseneer in blik/pot

en: Canned tomatoes
bg: Консервирани домати
da: Dåsetomater, Tomater på dåse
de: Dosentomaten, Tomaten in Dosen
es: Tomates en conserva
fi: purkitetut tomaatit
fr: Tomates en conserve, conserves de tomate
hr: Rajčice iz konzerve
it: Pomodori in scatola
nl: Tomaten in blik/pot
pl: Pomidory w puszce
pt: Tomates enlatados
sv: Tomater på dås

en: Green tomatoes
bg: Зелени домати
fr: Tomates vertes
hr: Zelene rajčice
nl: Groene tomaten
pl: Zielone pomidory

en: Plant-based pickles
ca: Conserves vegetals
de: Pflanzliches eingelegtes Pflanze
es: Vegetales encurtidos, Encurtidos vegetales
fi: kasvipohjaiset säilykkeet
fr: Pickles d'origine végétale
he: חמוצים מן הצומח
hr: Kiseli krastavci na biljnoj bazi
hu: Növényi savanyúságok, Savanyított zöldségek
it: Sottaceti a base di vegetali, Sottoaceti a base di vegetali, Sott'aceti a base di vegetali
nl: Plantaardige zoetzuren
pl: Marynowane produkty roślinne
pt: Pickles à base de plantas
ro: Legume murate
ru: Маринованные растительные продукты
sv: Inlagda växter
zh: 植物腌渍物

en: Pickled vegetables, Vegetable pickles
da: Syltede grøntsager
de: Eingelegtes Gemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas encurtidas, Encurtidos de verduras y hortalizas
fi: kasvissäilykkeet
fr: Pickles de légumes
hr: Ukiseljeno povrće
hu: Zöldséges savanyúság
it: Verdure sottaceto
nl: Ingemaakte groentes
pt: Pickles vegetais
ru: Маринованые овощи
sv: Inlagda grönsaker
tr: Sebze turşusu

en: Mixed vegetable pickles
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas encurtidas
fr: Pickles de légumes mélangés
hr: Kiseli krastavci od miješanog povrća
nl: Ingemaakte gemengde groentes

en: Acar
es: Acar, Achara
fr: Achards de légumes
hr: Automobil
ja: アチャール
nl: Atjars
zh: 亚渣

en: Atjar Tjampoer
xx: Atjar Tjampoer

en: Banana flowers in brine
cs: Banánový květ ve slaném nálevu
de: Bananenblüten in Salzwasser
nl: Bananenbloemen(gepekeld)

en: Pickled beetroots, Beetroot(pickled), Pickled beets
da: Syltede rødbeder
de: Eingelegte rote Bete
es: Remolacha encurtida
fr: Betteraves marinées
hr: Ukiseljena repa
ja: ビーツのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte rode bieten, Rode bieten op azijn

en: Pickled whole beetroots
da: Syltede hele rødbeder

en: Pickled sliced beetroots
da: Syltede rødbeder i skiver, Syltede skivede rødbeder

en: Pickled diced beetroots, Pickled cubed beetroots
da: Syltede rødbeder i tern

en: Pickled carrots
es: Zanahorias encurtidas
fr: Pickles de carottes
hr: Ukiseljena mrkva
ja: にんじんのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte wortels

en: Pickled cucumbers
bg: Кисели краставици
da: Syltede agurker
de: Eingelegte Gurken
es: Pepinos encurtidos
fi: säilötyt kurkut
fr: Pickles de concombres
hr: Ukiseljeni krastavci
hu: Savanyú uborka
it: Cetrioli sottaceto
ja: きゅうりのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte komkommer
ru: Маринованые огурцы
sv: Gurkor i lag, Inlagda gurkor
tr: Salatalık turşusu, Hıyar turşusu

en: Pickled gherkins, Gherkins (pickled), Pickled small cucumbers, Gherkins
bg: Кисели краставички
de: Essiggurken
es: Pepinillos, Pepinillos encurtidos
fi: suolakurkut
fr: Cornichons, Cornichon
hr: Kiseli krastavci
hu: Csemegeuborka
it: Cetriolini
nl: Ingemaakte Augurken
sv: Smågurkor i lag, Inlagda smågurkor

en: Gherkins pickled in brine, Salzgurke, Small cucumbers pickled in brine
de: Salzgurke
nb: Saltagurk
sv: Saltgurkor

en: Gherkins pickled in vinegar
bg: Кисели краставички с оцет
de: Gewürzgurken, Cornichons
fr: Cornichons au vinaigre
hr: Kiseli kornišoni
it: Cetriolini sottaceto
nl: Zure Augurken
sv: Cornichoner

en: Extra-fine gherkins
de: Extra-feine Cornichons
fi: Hienoja suolakurkkuja
fr: Cornichons extra-fins
hr: Ekstra-fini kornišoni
nl: Zeer fijne augurken

en: Fine gherkins
de: Feine Cornichons
fr: Cornichons fins
hr: Fini kornišoni
nl: Fijne augurken